test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    aassâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aasâm
    saađđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: saađâm
    addiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: addiittâlâm
    addiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: addiittâl
    adelâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adelâđâm
    agâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: agâstâlâm
    agâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: agâstâl
    ahevâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ahevâšâm
    aiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aaicâm
    aiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: áiccá
    aimâkkâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aimâkkâšâm
    alanâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: alanâd
    aldadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aldadâlâm
    almaaštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almaaštâlâm
    almottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almottâlâm
    almottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almottâđâm
    anadâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anadâđâm
    anattâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: anattâđâm
    arvâlâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: arvâlâdâm
    askadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: askadâlâm
    avkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aavhâm
    avkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ávkká
    avâštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: avâštâlâm
    aštiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aštiidâđâm
    aštiidâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aštiidât
    ađđiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ađđiistâlâm
    caaccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: caasâm
    caappâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: caavâm
    cagastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cagastâlâm
    cagastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cagastâl
    cakkârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cakkârâšâm
    cakkârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cakkârâš
    cakkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: caahâm
    ceggiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ceggiistâlâm
    cieggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciegâm
    ciegâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciegâstâl
    ciellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cielâm
    cieppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cievâm
    ciskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciská
    cissâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciisâm
    ciähudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciähudâđâm
    coggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: coogâm
    cogâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cogâdâđâm
    cojâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cojâdâđâm
    cojâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cojâdât
    coohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: coovâm
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: coojâm
    cooijâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: caja
    coommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: coomâm
    coommâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cama
    cuggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuugâm
    cummâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cummâluuvčâm
    cummâlâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cummâlâhš
    cummâlâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cummâlâšâm
    cuovkkiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuovkkiittâlâm
    cuskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuuskâm
    cuskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: coská
    cuvnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuuvnâm
    cuvnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: covná
    cuápcuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuápcuttâlâm
    cuápcuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuápcuttâl
    cáhádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cáhádâđâm
    cáhádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cáhádât
    cápcudâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cápcudâđâđ
    edirvâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: edirvâšâm
    elbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iälbá
    emedâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: emedâšâm
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: eeđâm
    ettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iätá
    faallâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fáálá
    falskiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falskiittâđâm
    falâluššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falâluuvčâm
    fattiittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fattiittâđâm
    faškastâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: faškastâđâm
    faškâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faškâsâd
    fierriittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fierriittâlâm
    fijnottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fijnottâlâm
    filliittâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: filliittât
    foskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fooskâm
    fáškudâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fáškudâlâm
    fáškáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fáškáástâlâm
    haahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haavâm
    hadastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hadastâlâm
    haddadâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haddadâlâm
    hammiittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hammiittâlâm
    hapârâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hapârâšâm
    haterâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haterâšâm
    havvuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: havvuustâlâm
    heiviittâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heiviittâlâm
    helbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heelbâm
    hepânâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hepânâšâm
    herskustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: herskustâlâm
    herskuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: herskuttâlâm
    hevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hevâttâđâm
    hevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hevâttât
    hiettâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hieđâm
    hilgottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilgottâđâm
    hilttiistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilttiistâlâm
    himáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: himáttâlâm
    hippâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiipâm
    hirmástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hirmástâlâm
    hiärástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiärástâlâm
    hokâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hokâttâlâm
    hoohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hoovâm
    hoohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huáhá
    hovrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávrá
    huhkádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huhkádâlâm
    huiháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huiháttâlâm
    hundâruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hundârušâm
    huollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huolâm
    hurgáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hurgáttâlâm
    hutkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huutkâm
    huunnjâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hunjá
    huškottâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huškottâđâm
    hámsutâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámsuttâđâm
    hámárdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámárdâlâm
    hánástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hánástâlâm
    háputtâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háputtâlâm
    háputtâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háputtâšâm
    hárjuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárjuttâlâm
    hárávâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárávâšâm
    hárččulâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárččuluuvčâm
    hárččulâhčâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hárččulâhš
    hástálâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hástálâd
    hávdádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hávdádâlâm
    hávskuttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hávskuttâlâm
    ihastâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ihastâlâm
    iiŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iŋá
    ijâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ijâstâlâm
    ilbâdâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ilbâdâšâm
    imâštâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: imâštâlâm
    imâštâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: imâštât
    irgástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: irgástâlâm
    irâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: irâstâlâm
    iskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iiskâm
    iskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iská
    iäljáruššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäljárušâm
    iäljárâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäljárâšâm
    iälustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iälustâlâm
    iäpádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäpádâlâm
    iätáduddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iätádudâm
    išedâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: išedâšâm
    ištâmâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ištâmâšâm
    ištâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iištâm
    išádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: išádâlâm
    jaammâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jaamâm
    jaannâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jááná
    jielttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jiälttá
    jiäháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiäháttâlâm
    jiänáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiänáttâlâm
    jorgáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jorgáttâlâm
    jorgáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jorgáttâl
    joskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jooskâm
    joskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: orniimist
    jovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: joovgâm
    jovgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: javga
    juksâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juuvsâm
    julástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: julástâlâm
    juoigâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juoigâm
    juottâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juotâm
    juovdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juovdâm
    juoŋŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juáŋá
    jurgâlâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurgâlâđâm
    jurmâgâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurmâgâd
    jurmâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurmâsâd
    jurmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jormá
    jurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juurâm
    jurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jorá
    jurâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jurâttâlâm
    jurâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jurâttâl
    juuccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juusâi
    juuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juuvâm
    juullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juulâm
    juurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juurâm
    juurrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jorá
    juvliistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juvliistâlâm
    juvâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: juvâttâlâm
    jyevdivâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jyevdivâšâm
    jáháttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jáháttâlâm
    jámálgâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jámálgâd
    kaarrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaarâm
    kaattâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaađâm
    kaggâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaagâm
    kaidâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaaidâm
    kaidâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: olgoláhháá
    kaivâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaivâsâdâm
    kalgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaalgâm
    kalvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kálvá
    kamâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kamâdâđâm
    karbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaarbâm
    karsâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaarsâm
    karttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaartâm
    karttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kárttá
    karvattâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: karvattâl
    kastâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kastâdâđâm
    kastâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaastâm
    kastâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kástá
    kavkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaavhâm
    kavkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kávkká
    kavnâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavnâttâđâm
    kavnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaavnâm
    kavnâđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kavnâđât
    kavâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavâstâlâm
    kašnattâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kašnattâlâm
    kađvâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kađvâdâđâm
    kađvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaađvâm
    kađâdâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kađâdât
    kaččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaačâm
    kaččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: káččá
    keehâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: keevâm
    keerrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiärá
    keevvâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiävá
    kejâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kejâstâlâm
    kerivuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kerivušâm
    kerivâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kerivâšâm
    kesijâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kesijâšâm
    kevâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kevâttâđâm
    keččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: keejâm
    kieimâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kieimâm
    kiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kielâm
    kiellâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiälá
    kiemârdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiemârdâlâm
    kierdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kierdâm
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâm
    kietkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kieđhâm
    kietâdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kietâdâlâm
    kieđâvuššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kieđâvušâm
    kiiccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kicá
    kiihâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiivâm
    kiimmâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kimá
    kiinnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiinâm
    kijvástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kijvástâlâm
    kiäldádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäldádâđâm
    kiälástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiälástâlâm
    kiäsádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsádâđâm
    kiäsáttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsáttâlâm
    kiäsáđâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäsáđâđâm
    kiäčádâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiäčádâlâm
    kiškodâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiškodât
    kiškuustâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiškuustâlâm
    kištottâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kištottâlâm
    kobdánâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kobdánâd
    koccáástâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koccáástâlâm
    kohádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kohádâđâm
    kohádâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kohádât
    koijâdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koijâdâlâm
    kokkâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kokkâsâdâm
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koolgâm
    kolgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalga
    kolliistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kolliistâlâm
    kolppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koolpâm
    kompâlâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kompâlâšâm
    komárdâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: komárdâlâm
    kooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koosâm
    kooccâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaca
    koorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koorâm
    koorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kara
    kopsettâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kopsettâđâm
    kopšâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kapša
    kordâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koordâm
    kordâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: karda
    korkkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koorhâm
    korppâsâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korppâsâdâm
    korriistâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korriistâlâm
    korristâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korristâlâm
    korrâdâššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korrâdâšâm
    korttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koortâm
    korttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kartta
    korâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: korâstâlâm
    koskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kooskâm
    koskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaska
    kostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koostâm
    kostâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuástá
    kozzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koozâm
    koškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kooškâm
    koškâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaška
    koččâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: koočâm
    kuhâstâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuhâstâlâm
    kukkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuhâm
    kukkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kokká
    kuldâlâddâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuldâlâdâm
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulgâm
    kulgâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolgá
    kulnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulnâm
    kulnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolná
    kulŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulŋâm
    kulŋâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolŋá
    kumâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kumâttâlâm
    kuohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuovâm
    kuoirâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuoirâm
    kuokkâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuohâm
    kuoppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuovâm
    kuorbâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuorbâm
    kuorrâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuorâm
    kuorssâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuorsâm
    kuorssâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuársá
    kuorâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuorâttâlâm
    kuoskâttâllâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuoskâttâlâm
    kuoskâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuoskâm
    kuossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuosâm
    kuovlâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuovlâm
    kuovzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuovzâm
    kuovzâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuávzá
    kuođâttâttâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuođâttâđâm
    kupsâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuupsâm
    kurssâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuursâm
    kurssâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kurssá
    kuullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulâm
    kuullâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kulá
    kuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuvâm
    kuuppâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kopá
    kuussâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuusâm
    kuuđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuđâm
    kuuđđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kođá
    kuvdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuuvdâm
    kuvdâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kovdá
